Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201452-2201
Financing statement filed prior to
November 1, 2003; loss of perfection; continuation statement; filing required;
contents; effect; Secretary of State; duties.

A financing statement filed to perfect a
lien pursuant to sections 52-202, 52-501, 52-701, 52-901, 52-1101, 52-1201,
52-1401 to 52-1411, 54-201, or 54-208, which was properly filed prior to November
1, 2003, shall lose its perfection unless a continuation statement is filed
with the Secretary of State after June 30, 2014, and before January 1, 2015.
Such continuation statement shall include a statement that the original financing
statement is still effective. The filing of a continuation statement shall
preserve the priority of the original filing and shall be effective for five
years after the date of filing of the continuation statement and may be subsequently
continued as provided in article 9, Uniform Commercial Code. Not later than
May 31, 2014, the Secretary of State shall notify, by first-class mail, the
lienholders of record of the liens described in this section that such a lien
shall lose its perfection unless a continuation statement is filed with the
Secretary of State as provided in this section.

Laws 2014, LB750, § 1.
April 11, 2014